browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 ud .
SFX 2596 Y 1
SFX 2596 0 iziuns .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 0 ui .
SFX 1583 Y 1
SFX 1583 0 ul .
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 um .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 un .
SFX 3308 Y 1
SFX 3308 0 ideschia .
SFX 3688 Y 1
SFX 3688 0 up .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ur .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 us .
SFX 1027 Y 1
SFX 1027 0 ut .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 0 entesch .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 ivavan .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 ivavas .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 seschia .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 tiseschia .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 va .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 iunalissem .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 vi .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 iain .
SFX 207 Y 1
SFX 207 0 iais .
SFX 1776 Y 1
SFX 1776 0 vs .
SFX 2327 Y 1
SFX 2327 0 aivlamain .
SFX 4731 Y 1
SFX 4731 0 ernain .
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 0 ernais .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 hettass .
SFX 2016 Y 1
SFX 2016 0 venziun .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 cheschia .
SFX 640 Y 1
SFX 640 0 lisaziun .
SFX 3230 Y 1
SFX 3230 0 latta .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 inass .
SFX 4787 Y 1
SFX 4787 0 egnond .
SFX 4711 Y 1
SFX 4711 0 etaria .
SFX 4330 Y 1
SFX 4330 0 ntada .
SFX 3966 Y 1
SFX 3966 0 tavel .
SFX 4328 Y 1
SFX 4328 0 ntads .
SFX 4545 Y 1
SFX 4545 0 imeschan .
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 0 imeschas .
SFX 1170 Y 1
SFX 1170 0 iala .
SFX 4619 Y 1
SFX 4619 0 ials .
SFX 4730 Y 1
SFX 4730 0 ernala .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 hettava .
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 0 uneschia .
SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 za .
SFX 1775 Y 1
SFX 1775 0 zi .
SFX 488 Y 1
SFX 488 0 inava .
SFX 3607 Y 1
SFX 3607 0 zs .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 drada .
SFX 1516 Y 1
SFX 1516 0 iunavan .
SFX 1515 Y 1
SFX 1515 0 iunavas .
SFX 1910 Y 1
SFX 1910 0 iana .
SFX 2758 Y 1
SFX 2758 0 drads .
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 0 ians .
SFX 1280 Y 1
SFX 1280 0 iant .
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 0 imond .
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 0 duras .
SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 0 gissan .
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 0 gissas .
SFX 4956 Y 1
SFX 4956 0 bà .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 ditgas .
SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 tian .
SFX 2899 Y 1
SFX 2899 0 undas .
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 tias .
SFX 4326 Y 1
SFX 4326 0 ntain .
SFX 4325 Y 1
SFX 4325 0 ntais .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 0 tisescha .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 iunescha .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 urusadad .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 tica .
SFX 1594 Y 1
SFX 1594 0 tics .
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 0 chevan .
SFX 836 Y 1
SFX 836 0 chevas .
SFX 1671 Y 1
SFX 1671 0 ivescha .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 0 erassan .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 erassas .
SFX 887 Y 1
SFX 887 0 tida .
SFX 2848 Y 1
SFX 2848 0 alà .
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 0 tids .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 drain .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 0 drais .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 iass .
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 0 tradas .
SFX 4543 Y 1
SFX 4543 0 imeschia .
SFX 1128 Y 1
SFX 1128 0 otta .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 tier .
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 0 tiez .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 isassan .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 isassas .
SFX 3600 Y 1
SFX 3600 0 afain .
SFX 4960 Y 1
SFX 4960 0 avels .
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 0 ectadas .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 iava .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 eraziun .
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 0 tivesch .
SFX 4959 Y 1
SFX 4959 0 avent .
SFX 1670 Y 1
SFX 1670 0 iveschan .
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 0 iveschas .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 0 sada .
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 0 sadi .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 ilesch .
SFX 636 Y 1
SFX 636 0 sads .
SFX 134 Y 1
SFX 134 0 isaziun .
SFX 1942 Y 1
SFX 1942 0 arisond .
SFX 1849 Y 1
SFX 1849 0 oda .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 ntass .
SFX 3355 Y 1
SFX 3355 0 furm .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 idian .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 idias .
SFX 3905 Y 1
SFX 3905 0 tima .
SFX 3252 Y 1
SFX 3252 0 itaras .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 ualisesch .
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 0 sain .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 sais .
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 0 tina .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 tind .
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 0 ting .
SFX 1557 Y 1
SFX 1557 0 getta .
SFX 4317 Y 1
SFX 4317 0 ntava .
SFX 2059 Y 1
SFX 2059 0 tins .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 0 drass .
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 0 ogn .
SFX 1748 Y 1
SFX 1748 0 già .
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 0 icamain .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 0 egliond .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 0 lassan .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 lassas .
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 0 iditad .
SFX 4585 Y 1
SFX 4585 0 ificaziuns .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 aritad .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 ivissem .
SFX 1350 Y 1
SFX 1350 0 oid .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 iveschia .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 aturas .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 schetta .
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 0 dend .
SFX 2949 Y 1
SFX 2949 0 turavan .
SFX 2948 Y 1
SFX 2948 0 turavas .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 dent .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 visiun .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 drava .
SFX 2235 Y 1
SFX 2235 0 ianta .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 giada .
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 giads .
SFX 2057 Y 1
SFX 2057 0 tira .
SFX 3919 Y 1
SFX 3919 0 tifitgassan .
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 0 tifitgassas .
SFX 955 Y 1
SFX 955 0 laziun .
SFX 1845 Y 1
SFX 1845 0 omat .
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 0 grafias .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 ola .
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 0 tiss .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 tist .
SFX 4279 Y 1
SFX 4279 0 ols .
SFX 1660 Y 1
SFX 1660 0 mentà .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 vegna .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 vegni .
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 0 vegns .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 0 aments .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 turond .
SFX 927 Y 1
SFX 927 0 ascha .
SFX 2238 Y 1
SFX 2238 0 grafica .
SFX 2640 Y 1
SFX 2640 0 ignond .
SFX 3870 Y 1
SFX 3870 0 tivond .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 ders .
SFX 2137 Y 1
SFX 2137 0 ona .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 ond .
SFX 4753 Y 1
SFX 4753 0 enzial .
SFX 4734 Y 1
SFX 4734 0 erleschian .
SFX 4733 Y 1
SFX 4733 0 erleschias .
SFX 4837 Y 1
SFX 4837 0 dents .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 dess .
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 0 tiva .
SFX 4390 Y 1
SFX 4390 0 metrica .
SFX 1814 Y 1
SFX 1814 0 tivs .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 irà .
SFX 1389 Y 1
SFX 1389 0 giain .
SFX 3358 Y 1
SFX 3358 0 fitgond .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 giais .
SFX 2668 Y 1
SFX 2668 0 ianza .
SFX 1843 Y 1
SFX 1843 0 peschian .
SFX 1842 Y 1
SFX 1842 0 peschias .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 sass .
SFX 3684 Y 1
SFX 3684 0 upladas .
SFX 3605 Y 1
SFX 3605 0 acca .
SFX 1024 Y 1
SFX 1024 0 chescha .
SFX 1186 Y 1
SFX 1186 0 deva .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 ora .
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 0 ori .
SFX 4842 Y 1
SFX 4842 0 dadad .
SFX 728 Y 1
SFX 728 0 dadas .
SFX 1248 Y 1
SFX 1248 0 rola .
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 0 osa .
SFX 4234 Y 1
SFX 4234 0 oss .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 siunassan .
SFX 3122 Y 1
SFX 3122 0 ost .
SFX 4023 Y 1
SFX 4023 0 siunassas .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 sava .
SFX 3113 Y 1
SFX 3113 0 puna .
SFX 4966 Y 1
SFX 4966 0 atissem .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 isesch .
SFX 4233 Y 1
SFX 4233 0 otg .
SFX 4982 Y 1
SFX 4982 0 atadas .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 giant .
SFX 676 Y 1
SFX 676 0 rond .
SFX 4511 Y 1
SFX 4511 0 istivan .
SFX 4510 Y 1
SFX 4510 0 istivas .
SFX 3709 Y 1
SFX 3709 0 unalisond .
SFX 4712 Y 1
SFX 4712 0 estond .
SFX 3458 Y 1
SFX 3458 0 dader .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 0 zzada .
SFX 1982 Y 1
SFX 1982 0 zzads .
SFX 3472 Y 1
SFX 3472 0 clai .
SFX 4882 Y 1
SFX 4882 0 clan .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 clar .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 0 clas .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 fundà .
SFX 3623 Y 1
SFX 3623 0 ziunament .
SFX 4190 Y 1
SFX 4190 0 pusa .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 inian .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 inias .
SFX 1480 Y 1
SFX 1480 0 netta .
SFX 1555 Y 1
SFX 1555 0 giass .
SFX 4800 Y 1
SFX 4800 0 ecziunar .
SFX 4341 Y 1
SFX 4341 0 nels .
SFX 4874 Y 1
SFX 4874 0 clel .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 0 zzain .
SFX 4947 Y 1
SFX 4947 0 bavan .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 zzais .
SFX 4946 Y 1
SFX 4946 0 bavas .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 0 tinavan .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 tinavas .
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 0 scrivai .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 scrivan .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 scrivas .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 giava .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 idavan .
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 0 idavas .
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 0 itgond .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 cheschian .
SFX 1194 Y 1
SFX 1194 0 cheschias .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 iunai .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 iunal .
SFX 1521 Y 1
SFX 1521 0 iunar .
SFX 3907 Y 1
SFX 3907 0 tifitgond .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 stescha .
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 0 sescha .
SFX 4597 Y 1
SFX 4597 0 icular .
SFX 3468 Y 1
SFX 3468 0 clia .
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 0 final .
