browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
gest/1,9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,99,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,211,1366,1367,1507,1508,1509,1510,1511,1512,1513,1514,1515,1516,1517,1518,1519,1520,1521,1522,1523,1524,1525,1675,2183,4597,4598
grav/5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,64,70,80,141,176,181,192,199,442,671,1369,1370,1375,1545,1546,1547,1705,1707,1708,1709,1710,1711,1712,1713,1714,1715,1716,2624,3306,3307,3308,3309,3310,3311,3312,3563
gua/9,13,16,56,60,75,82,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,204,257,321,443,572,617,634,942,995,996,997,998,999,1119,1120,1135,1249,1250,1251,1252,1253,1254,1255,1256,1257,1258,1348,1795,1856,1935,2515,3104,4180
inv/3,4,33,339,369,450,1139,1369,3134,3135,3136,3393,3440,3575,4287,4288,4289,4290,4291,4292,4293,4296,4297,4298,4299,4300,4301,4302,4303,4304,4305,4306,4307,4308,4486,4713,4714,4715,4716,4717,4718,4719,4730
l'er/13,1457,1758,3966,4001,4034
l'in/5,993,1240,2016,2118,2467,2769,3043,3236,3349,3451,3998,4690,4905
liun/1,179,626
l'o/573,703,1027,2315
mess/1910,2329
min/1,3,5,9,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,98,325,327,359,599,606,671,741,781,806,1526,1537,2369,2405,2540,2656,3004,3409,3607,4489,4490,4491,4492,4493,4494,4495,4496,4497,4498,4499,4500,4501,4502,4503,4504,4505,4506,4507,4508,4752,4988
nat/60,68,78,82,83,86,105,146,192,196,366,376,781,961,4476
notar/1170
pers/16,67,99,351,736,1007,1207,1583,1910
process/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,154,181,211,265,674,884,1426
propri/1,4711
sch/4,6,9,30,31,32,67,78,88,183,191,218,233,248,253,262,302,326,331,436,465,719,743,1048,1100,1198,1487,1693,1694,1696,1940,2029,2177,2573,2574,2576,2579,2580,2581,2582,2583,2584,2585,2586,2587,2588,2589,2590,2591,3134,3137,3230,3258,3415,3565,3691,4288,4289,4290,4291,4292,4293,4406,4768,4958
schen/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,48,49,50,51,52,54,55,60,84,248,289,296,858,868,1019,1042,1170,1246,1247,1772,1825,2308,2309,2747,2748,2749,2750,2751,2752,2753,2754,2755,2756,2757,2758,2759,3448,4824,4825,4826,4827,4828
seria/640,1638,4694
sien/314,329,330,340,341,342,343,344,345,346,347,348,349,355,356,1344,1393,1394,1395,1396,1397,1528,2298,2299
sir/1,5,8,67,183,602,1179,2734,3688
skizza/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,84,89,90,91,92,93,111,112
smin/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,203,454,455,537,538,557,558,559,560,561,562,563,564,565,566,567,1021,1022,1023,1024,1025,1194,1195,1328,1329,1330,1331,1332,1333,1334,1584,1793,2378,2379,2931,2932,2933,2934,2935,2936,2937,2938,2939,2940,2941
snui/1775,3629
spazi/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,78,98,146,217,252,366,673,701,737,738,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,1103,1104,1105,1106,1107,1421,1422,2904
stra/12,53,62,77,144,151,235,327,359,571,807,923,1092,1208,1261,1644,1847,2080,2393,2412,2620,2743,2774,2993,2994,2995,4841
sut/1,83,363,381,664,741,802,806,839,1202,1269,1469,1557,2021,2132,2425,2768,2818,3072,3073,3117,3124,3197,3198,3199,3201,3202,3204,3205,3206,3208,3209,3210,3211,3351,3354,3380,3502,3896,3978,3979,4038,4193,4230,4294,4295,4379,4407,4899,4905
tal/1,3,5,8,33,57,65,81,136,176,235,261,314,339,373,406,600,750,1044,1410,1910,3329
trad/9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,534,706,1527,2596,3761
unic/81,292
vai/2,11,13,16,54,83,165,244,289,360,517,1776,2308,2309,2880
Var/2235
ven/56,78,98,180,225,327,366,428,784,868,1340,1753,1931,2083,2296,2297,2405,2708,2710,2711,2712,2713,2714,2715,2716,2717,2718,2719,2720,2721,2722,2724,2725,2726,2727,2728,2729,3349,3863,3967,4619
verd/195,303,439,451,468,469,485,486,487,488,489,490,491,492,493,532,533,642,667,693,694,695,696,925
vers/98,452
ves/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,30,31,32,56,60,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,136,151,261,264,472,605,630,1696,1817,1818,1819,1966,2076,2077,2078,2318,2327,2403,2404,2408,2409,2516,2998,2999,3000,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3115,3933,3934,3935,4695,4895
